Missouri, session 2026, HB2090.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 441, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 441.950, to read as follows:
441.950. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Assisted housing development", a multifamily rental housing development
of five or more units that receives federal or state housing assistance;
(2) "Positive rental payment information", information regarding a tenant's
complete, timely payments of rent. The term does not include an instance in which a
tenant did not completely or timely make a rental payment.
2. As specified in subsection 3 of this section and except as provided in
subsection 10 of this section, any landlord of a dwelling unit of residential real property
shall offer any tenant obligated on the lease the option of having the tenant's positive
rental payment information reported to at least one nationwide consumer reporting
agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)) or any other consumer reporting agency that meets the definition
in Section 603(f) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(f)) as long as the
consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes rental payment information to
a nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of
the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)).
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2090 2
3. For leases entered into on and after February 1, 2027, the offer of positive
rental payment information reporting shall be made at the time of the lease agreement
and at least once annually thereafter. For leases outstanding as of August 28, 2026, the
offer of positive rental payment information reporting shall be made no later than
February 1, 2027, and at least once annually thereafter.
4. A landlord may provide the offer of positive rental payment information
reporting required under subsection 2 of this section to the tenant by regular first-class
mail or by email.
5. The offer of positive rental payment information reporting shall include a
written election of positive rental payment information reporting that contains all of the
following:
(1) A statement that reporting of the tenant's positive rental payment
information is optional;
(2) Identification of each consumer reporting agency to which positive rental
payment information will be reported;
(3) The amount of any fee charged under subsection 8 of this section;
(4) Instructions on how to submit the written election of positive rental payment
information reporting to the landlord by regular first-class mail or by email;
(5) A statement that the tenant may opt into positive rental payment information
reporting at any time following the initial offer by the landlord;
(6) A statement that the tenant may elect to stop positive rental payment
information reporting at any time but that the tenant shall not be able to resume
positive rental payment information reporting for at least six months after the election
to opt out;
(7) Instructions on how to opt out of positive rental payment information
reporting; and
(8) A signature block that the tenant shall date and sign in order to accept the
offer of positive rental payment information reporting.
6. If the offer of positive rental payment information reporting is made by
regular first-class mail, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a stamped, self-
addressed envelope to return the written election of positive rental payment information
reporting.
7. (1) A tenant may submit the tenant's completed written election of positive
rental payment information reporting at any time after the tenant receives the offer of
positive rental payment information reporting from the landlord.
(2) (a) A tenant may request additional copies of the written election of positive
rental payment information reporting from the landlord at any time.

HB 2090 3
(b) A landlord who receives a request from a tenant under this subdivision shall
comply with the request.
8. (1) If a tenant elects to have that tenant's positive rental payment information
reported to a consumer reporting agency under subsection 2 of this section, the landlord
may require that tenant to pay a fee not to exceed the lesser of the actual cost to the
landlord to provide the service or ten dollars per month. If the landlord does not incur
any actual cost to report positive rental payment information, no amount shall be
charged. The payment or nonpayment of this fee by the tenant shall not be reported to a
consumer reporting agency.
(2) An amount tendered in full or partial satisfaction of rent or any other
obligation under the lease, however designated by the party tendering the payment,
shall not be applied or credited to the fee authorized by this subsection.
9. If a tenant fails to pay any fee required by the landlord under subsection 8 of
this section, all of the following shall apply:
(1) The failure to pay the fee shall not be cause for termination of the tenancy,
whether under chapter 534 or otherwise;
(2) The landlord shall not deduct the unpaid fee from the tenant's security
deposit; and
(3) If the fee remains unpaid for thirty days or more, the landlord may stop
reporting the tenant's rental payments and the tenant shall not elect positive rental
payment information reporting again for a period of six months from the date on which
the fee first became due.
10. A tenant who elects to have positive rental payment information reported as
described in subsection 2 of this section may subsequently file a written request with the
tenant's landlord to stop that reporting with which the landlord shall comply. A tenant
who elects to stop reporting shall not be allowed to elect positive rental payment
information reporting again for a period of at least six months from the date of the
tenant's written request to stop reporting.
11. This section shall not apply to either of the following:
(1) A landlord of a residential rental building that contains fifteen or fewer
dwelling units unless both of the following apply:
(a) The landlord owns more than one residential rental building regardless of the
number of units in each building; and
(b) The landlord is one of the following:
a. A real estate investment trust, as defined in Section 856 of Title 26 of the
United States Code;
b. A corporation; or

HB 2090 4
c. A limited liability company in which at least one member is a corporation; or
(2) An assisted housing development.
12. A tenant who elects to have positive rental payment information reported
does not forfeit any rights under section 441.234. If a tenant makes deductions from
rent or otherwise withholds rent as authorized by law, the deductions or withholding of
rent shall not constitute a late rental payment. A tenant invoking the right to repair and
deduct or withhold rent shall notify the tenant's landlord of the deduction or
withholding prior to the date rent is due. This subsection shall not be construed to
relieve a housing provider of the obligation to maintain habitable premises.
✔